Maryland, session 2025, HB1283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
25–102.
(a) The provisions of the Maryland Vehicle Law do not prevent a local authority,
in the reasonable exercise of its police power, from exercising the following powers as to
highways under its jurisdiction:
(1) Subject to the provisions of § 21–1003.1 of this article, regulating or
prohibiting the stopping, standing, or parking of vehicles;
(2) Regulating traffic by means of police officers or traffic control devices;
(3) Regulating or prohibiting processions or assemblies on highways;
(4) Designating particular highways or separate roadways as one–way
highways and requiring that all vehicles on them move in one specified direction;
(5) Regulating the speed and weight of vehicles in public parks;
(6) Designating any highway as a through highway or designating any
intersection as a stop intersection or a yield intersection;
(7) Restricting the use of highways as provided in Title 24 of this article;
– 1 –

Ch. 583 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(8) Regulating the operation of bicycles, requiring them to be registered,
and imposing a registration fee;
(9) Regulating or prohibiting the turning of vehicles or specified types of
vehicles at intersections;
(10) Altering speed limits as provided in Title 21, Subtitle 8 of this article;
(11) Regulating through truck traffic and prohibiting trucks from using any
highway or alley that is not designated or maintained as a part or extension of the State or
federal highway system, provided the local authority has designated an adequate alternate
route for diverted truck traffic;
(12) Adopting any other traffic regulations as specifically authorized in the
Maryland Vehicle Law;
(13) Regulating taxi stands, including taxi stands in the middle of a block;
(14) (i) In this paragraph, “all–terrain vehicle” includes an off–highway
motorcycle.
(ii) 1. Subject to item 2 of this item, except in Allegany County
and Garrett County, designating a certain portion of highways upon which snowmobiles
may travel for the sole purpose of gaining access to snowmobile trails; but
2. Designating only those highways which divide snowmobile
trails and which would otherwise obstruct direct access between snowmobile trails; and
(iii) In Allegany County and Garrett County:
1. Authorizing a person to:
A. Cross a highway on an all–terrain vehicle or a snowmobile
at a right angle at a speed of not more than 25 miles per hour; or
B. Operate an all–terrain vehicle or a snowmobile on not
more than 5 miles of highway at a speed of not more than 25 miles per hour; and
2. Designating a certain portion of highways upon which
all–terrain vehicles and snowmobiles may travel at a speed of not more than 25 miles per
hour for the sole purpose of gaining access to:
A. Trails on which the operation of an all–terrain vehicle or
a snowmobile is authorized;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 583
B. Fields; or
C. Another area where the operation of an all–terrain vehicle
or a snowmobile is authorized;
(15) Requiring a motorized minibike to be permitted by the local authority,
and imposing a permit fee;
(16) In Allegany County, designating crossings on county highways where a
person operating a golf cart may cross the highway for continued access to any portion of a
golf course;
(17) Restricting use of a low speed vehicle on a highway;
(18) Authorizing an emergency vehicle not subject to registration to operate
on a highway while performing an emergency service as defined in § 19–103 of this article;
[and]
(19) Authorizing a person to cross a highway on an all–terrain vehicle at a
right angle to access a farm or to move from one part of a farm to another part of the same
farm; AND
(20) IN CHARLES COUNTY:
(I) REGULATING THE OPERATION OF OFF–HIGHWAY
RECREATIONAL VEHICLES;
(II) REQUIRING OFF–HIGHWAY RECREATIONAL VEHICLES TO
BE REGISTERED BY THE COUNTY AND IMPOSING A REGISTRATION FEE;
(III) IMPOSING AGE RESTRICTIONS ON THE OPERATION OF
OFF–HIGHWAY RECREATIONAL VEHICLES; AND
(IV) AUTHORIZING THE IMPOUNDMENT OF AN OFF–HIGHWAY
RECREATIONAL VEHICLE THAT IS THE SUBJECT OF AN ALLEGED VIOLATION OF:
1. TITLE 21, SUBTITLE 9 OF THIS ARTICLE;
2. § 6–404 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE; OR
3. § 6–405 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
– 3 –

Ch. 583 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 4 –